Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-606
Criminal simulation; penalty.

(1) A person commits a criminal simulation when:

(a) With intent to deceive or harm, he makes, alters, or represents an object in such fashion that it appears to have an antiquity, rarity, source or authorship, ingredient, or composition which it does not in fact have; or

(b) With knowledge of its true character and with intent to use to deceive or harm, he utters, misrepresents, or possesses any object so simulated.

(2) Criminal simulation is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 128.